Utah statutes.
26-8a-309.   Out-of-state vehicles.
(1)  An ambulance or emergency response vehicle from another state may not
pick up a patient in Utah to transport that patient to another location in
Utah or to another state without a permit issued under Section 26-8a-304 and,
in the case of an ambulance, a license issued under Part 4, Ambulance and
Paramedic Providers.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), an ambulance or emergency response
vehicle from another state may, without a permit or license:
(a)  transport a patient into Utah; and
(b)  provide assistance in time of disaster.
(3)  The department may enter into agreements with ambulance and paramedic
providers and their respective licensing agencies from other states to assure
the expeditious delivery of emergency medical services beyond what may be
reasonably provided by licensed ambulance and paramedic providers, including
the transportation of patients between states.
